Utah statutes.
77-16b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Correctional facility" means a county jail or secure correctional facility as defined by Section 64-13-1.

(2)  "Correctional facility administrator" means a county sheriff in charge of a county jail or a designee of the executive director of the Utah Department of Corrections.

(3)  "Medical supervision" means under the direction of a licensed physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

(4)  "Mental health therapist" has the same definition as in Section 58-60-102.

(5)  "Prisoner" means any person who is a pretrial detainee or has been committed to the custody of a sheriff or the Utah Department of Corrections, and who is physically in a correctional facility.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2012 General Session

